fst/morphology/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-A-ihkwa_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - ihkwa - ok : # -m animate noun, louse AEW NA4w, no loc.
     ihkwa+N+A+Sg: ihkwa
     ihkwa+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: nitihkom
     ihkwa+N+A+Px2Sg+Sg: kitihkom
     ihkwa+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg: nitihkominân
     ihkwa+N+A+Px21Pl+Sg: kitihkominaw
     ihkwa+N+A+Px2Pl+Sg: kitihkomiwâw

     ihkwa+N+A+Pl: ihkwak
     ihkwa+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl: nitihkomak
     ihkwa+N+A+Px2Sg+Pl: kitihkomak
     ihkwa+N+A+Px1Pl+Pl: nitihkominânak
     ihkwa+N+A+Px21Pl+Pl: kitihkominawak
     ihkwa+N+A+Px2Pl+Pl: kitihkomiwâwak
     
     ihkwa+N+A+Obv: ihkwa
     ihkwa+N+A+Px1Sg+Obv: nitihkoma
     ihkwa+N+A+Px2Sg+Obv: kitihkoma
     ihkwa+N+A+Px1Pl+Obv: nitihkominâna
     ihkwa+N+A+Px21Pl+Obv: kitihkominawa
     ihkwa+N+A+Px2Pl+Obv: kitihkomiwâwa
     ihkwa+N+A+Px3Sg+Obv: otihkoma
     ihkwa+N+A+Px3Pl+Obv: otihkomiwâwa
     ihkwa+N+A+Px4Sg/Pl+Obv: otihkomiyiwa
     
     ihkwa+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Sg: [ihkos, ihkosis]
     ihkwa+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: [nicihkomis, nicihkomisis]
     ihkwa+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px2Sg+Sg: [kicihkomis, kicihkomisis]
     ihkwa+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg: [nicihkomisinân, nicihkomisisinân]
     ihkwa+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px21Pl+Sg: [kicihkomisinaw, kicihkomisisinaw]
     ihkwa+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px2Pl+Sg: [kicihkomisiwâw, kicihkomisisiwâw]

     ihkwa+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Pl: [ihkosak, ihkosisak]
     ihkwa+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl: [nicihkomisak, nicihkomisisak]
     ihkwa+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px2Sg+Pl: [kicihkomisak, kicihkomisisak]
     ihkwa+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Pl+Pl: [nicihkomisinânak, nicihkomisisinânak]
     ihkwa+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px21Pl+Pl: [kicihkomisinawak, kicihkomisisinawak]
     ihkwa+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px2Pl+Pl: [kicihkomisiwâwak, kicihkomisisiwâwak]
     
     ihkwa+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px3Sg+Obv: [ocihkomisa, ocihkomisisa]
     ihkwa+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px3Pl+Obv: [ocihkomisiwâwa, ocihkomisisiwâwa]
     ihkwa+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px4Sg/Pl+Obv: [ocihkomisiyiwa, ocihkomisisiyiwa]
